California statutes. Education Code
(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration and funding of educational programs and support services to be provided to disabled students by community college districts pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 67310) of Chapter 14 of Part 40 of Division 5.

(b) As used in this section, “disabled students” are persons with exceptional needs who have applied to or enrolled at a community college who, because of a verified disability, cannot fully benefit from classes, activities, and services regularly provided by the college without specific additional specialized services or educational programs.

(c) The regulations adopted by the board of governors shall provide for the apportionment of funds to each community college district to offset the direct excess cost of providing specialized support services or instruction, or both, to disabled students enrolled in state-supported disabled student services programs or courses. Direct excess costs are those actual fixed, variable, and one-time costs, as defined in Section 67311, which exceed the combined total of the following:

(1) The average cost to the district of providing services to nondisabled students times the number of students served by disabled student programs and services.

(2) The indirect cost to the district of providing facilities and support for the administration of disabled student programs and services.

(3) The revenue derived from average daily attendance in special classes.

(4) Any other funds for serving disabled students which the district receives from federal, state, or local sources.

(d) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this section, each community college district shall certify that reasonable efforts have been made to utilize all funds from federal, state, or local sources which are available for serving disabled students. Districts shall also provide the programmatic and fiscal information concerning programs and services for disabled students that the regulations of the board of governors require.

(e) The board of governors may authorize the chancellor, consistent with the requirements the board may impose, to designate up to 3
 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this section for program development and program accountability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (AB 2791)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Flexible Calendar [84890. - 84890.]

84890.

A community college district board may offer, subject to the approval of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and in accordance with rules and regulations to be adopted by the board of governors, courses under a flexible calendar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 688.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Adult Education Program [84900. - 84920.]

84900.

The Adult Education Program is hereby established under the administration of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 40.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

84901.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply, unless otherwise specified:

(a) “Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older.

(b) “Carryover” means the amount of unspent adult education program funds from the prior fiscal year, certified on or before September 1 of the current fiscal year, expressed as a percentage of the prior fiscal year’s allocation.

(c) “Consortium” means an adult education consortium approved pursuant to this article.

(d) “Executive director” means the executive director of the State Board of Education.

(e) “Immigrant integration” means a two-way process in which immigrants and the receiving society work together to build secure, thriving, cohesive, and inclusive communities. In the process, immigrants are embraced and welcomed by the receiving society with effective, culturally relevant, and linguistically accessible programs and services that facilitate their linguistic, economic, civic, and social integration and provide upward social and economic mobility, increased civic participation, and multigenerational integration, and service providers encourage immigrants to maximize their contributions to the economic and civic life of their communities.

(f) “Program” means the Adult Education Program established by Section 84900.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 779, Sec. 1.   (SB 670)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

84902.

(a) The chancellor and the Superintendent are the state officials responsible for identifying and understanding the educational needs of adults in the state.

(b) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall use the powers provided by this article to support the effective provision of services that address the educational needs of adults in all regions of the state.

(c) In performing duties under this article, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall seek advice from, and coordinate with, other state officials responsible for programs for adults.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84903.

(a) The chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall divide the state into adult education regions and shall determine the physical boundaries of each region.

(b) When determining the boundaries of the adult education regions, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall consider factors that impact the provision of adult education, including all of the following:

(1) Economic and demographic factors, including the locations of regional labor markets.

(2) The boundaries of regions used to distribute funds for other state programs.

(3) The presence of adult education providers that have demonstrated effectiveness in meeting the educational needs of adults.

(c) Until otherwise determined by the chancellor and the Superintendent, the physical boundaries of the adult education regions shall be the same as the physical boundaries of the regions established for purposes of providing planning and implementation grants pursuant to Section 84830.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84904.

(a) The chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall approve one adult education consortium in each adult education region.

(b) Until otherwise determined by the chancellor and the Superintendent, the consortia to which planning and implementation grants were apportioned pursuant to Section 84830 shall be deemed approved for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84905.

The chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall approve, for each consortium, rules and procedures that adhere to all of the following conditions:

(a) Any community college district, school district, or county office of education, or any joint powers authority consisting of community college districts, school districts, county offices of education, or a combination of these, located within the boundaries of the adult education region shall be permitted to join the consortium as a member.

(b) As a condition of joining a consortium, a member shall commit to reporting any funds available to that member for the purposes of education and workforce
 services for adults and the uses of those funds.

(c) A member of the consortium shall be represented only by an official designated by the governing board of the member.

(d) (1) Decisionmaking procedures are specified that ensure that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) All members of the consortium shall participate in any decision made by the consortium.

(B) A proposed decision is considered at an open, properly noticed public meeting of the consortium at which members of the public may comment.

(C) The consortium has provided the public with adequate notice of a proposed decision and considered any comments submitted by members of the public, and any
 comments submitted by members of the public have been distributed publicly.

(D) (i) The consortium has requested comments regarding a proposed decision from other entities located in the adult education region that provide education and workforce services for adults.

(ii) The consortium has considered and responded to any comments submitted by entities pursuant to clause (i).

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, entities that provide education and workforce services to adults include, but are not necessarily limited to, local public agencies, departments, and offices, particularly those with responsibility for local public safety and social services; workforce investment boards; libraries; and community-based organizations.

(E) The consortium has considered input provided by pupils, teachers employed by local educational agencies, community college faculty, principals, administrators, classified staff, and the local bargaining units of the school districts and community college districts before it makes a decision.

(F) A decision is final.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a decision includes approval of an adult education plan pursuant to Section 84906 and approval of a distribution schedule pursuant to Section 84913.

(e) The members of the consortium may decide to designate a member to serve as the fund administrator to receive and distribute funds from the program. If a member is chosen to be the fund administrator, the member shall commit to developing a process to apportion funds to each member of the consortium
 pursuant to the consortium’s adult education plan within 45 days of receiving funds appropriated for the program. This process shall not require a consortium member to be funded on a reimbursement basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 18.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

84906.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, as a condition of receipt of an apportionment of funds from this program for a fiscal year, the members of a consortium shall have a consortium-approved three-year adult education plan that addresses a three-year fiscal planning cycle. The plan shall be updated at least once each year based on available data pertaining to the requirements of subdivision (b).

(2) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, as a condition of receipt of an apportionment of funds from this program, the members of a consortium shall have a consortium-approved adult education plan that satisfies subdivision (c).

(3) (A) Before establishing a career technical education training program, each member of a local adult education consortium, or the consortium as a whole, shall conduct a job market study of the labor market area in which it proposes to establish the career technical education training program or rely upon the most recent job market study of the labor market area conducted by the local workforce development board. The study shall use local labor market information and consider a supply analysis of existing career technical education training programs for adults maintained by high schools, community colleges, and other postsecondary educational institutions in the geographic area to ensure that the anticipated employment demand for adults enrolled in the proposed training program justifies the establishment of the proposed courses of instruction.

(B) After completing the job market study and before establishing the career technical education training program, the governing body of a member of a local adult education consortium, or the consortium as a whole, as applicable, shall determine if the job market study justifies the proposed career technical education program.

(b) An adult education plan shall include all of the following:

(1) An evaluation of the educational needs of adults in the region.

(2) A list of the following:

(A) Entities that provide education and workforce services to adults in the region.

(B) Entities that are impacted by, or that have a fundamental interest in, the provision of those services.

(3) A description of the services provided by entities listed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) An evaluation of current levels and types of education and workforce services for adults in the region.

(5) An evaluation of the funds available to the members of the consortium and the entities listed pursuant to paragraph (2), including funds other than those apportioned pursuant to this article.

(6) Actions that the members of the consortium will take to address the educational needs identified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(7) Actions that the members of the consortium will take to improve the effectiveness of their services.

(8) Actions that the members of the consortium, the entities listed pursuant to paragraph (2), and other interested parties will take to improve integration of services and to improve transitions into postsecondary education and the workforce, including actions related to all of the following:

(A) Placement of adults seeking education and workforce services into adult education programs.

(B) Alignment of academic standards and curricula for programs across entities that provide education and workforce services to adults.

(C) Qualifications of instructors, including common standards across entities that provide education and workforce services to adults.

(D) Collection and availability of data.

(9) A description of the alignment of adult education services supported by this program with those described in other education and workforce plans guiding services in the region, including plans pertaining to the building of career pathways and the employment of workforce sector strategies and those required pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(10) A description of the ways in which each of the entities identified in paragraph (2) contributed to the development of the plan.

(c) For the 2015–16, 2016–17, 2017–18, and 2018–19 fiscal years, a regional plan developed pursuant to Section 84830 shall satisfy the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 100.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

84907.

No later than July 31, 2015, the chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall certify, for each school district and county office of education, the amount of state funds required to be expended for adult education pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 2575, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84908.

(a) If the total amount certified for all school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Section 84907 is less than three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000), the chancellor and the Superintendent shall do both of the following:

(1) Apportion funds appropriated for the program in the Budget Act of 2015, no later than August 30, 2015, to each school district or county office of education in an amount equal to the amount certified for that school district or county office of education pursuant to Section 84907. As a condition of receipt of an apportionment, a school district or county office of education is required to be a member of a consortium.

(2) (A) (i) With the concurrence of the executive director, approve a schedule of allocations to each consortium, no later than October 30, 2015, of any funds appropriated for the program in the Budget Act of 2015 that remain after funds have been apportioned pursuant to paragraph (1).

(ii) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall determine the amount to be allocated to each consortium pursuant to this paragraph based on that adult education region’s share of the statewide need for adult education.

(B) Using the schedule approved pursuant to subparagraph (A), the chancellor and the Superintendent shall do one of the following for each consortium:

(i) Apportion funds to a fund administrator designated by the
 members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after approval of the schedule pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) Apportion funds to members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after receipt of a final distribution schedule from that consortium.

(b) If the total amount certified for all school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Section 84907 equals or exceeds three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000), the chancellor and the Superintendent shall do both of the following:

(1) Apportion funds appropriated for the program in the Budget Act of 2015, no later than August 30, 2015, to each school district or county office of education in an amount equal to the amount certified for that school district or county office of education pursuant to Section 84907 multiplied by
 three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000), divided by the total amount certified for all school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Section 84907.

(2) (A) (i) With the concurrence of the executive director, approve a schedule of allocations to each consortium, no later than October 30, 2015, of any funds appropriated for this program in the Budget Act of 2015 that remain after funds have been apportioned pursuant to paragraph (1).

(ii) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall determine the amount to be allocated to each consortium pursuant to this paragraph based on that adult education region’s share of the statewide need for adult education.

(B) Using the schedule approved pursuant to subparagraph (A), the chancellor and the
 Superintendent shall do one of the following for each consortium:

(i) Apportion funds to a fund administrator designated by the members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after approval of the schedule pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) Apportion funds to members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after receipt of a final distribution schedule from that consortium.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2016, and, as of January 1, 2017, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2017, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84909.

(a) This section shall apply commencing with the 2016–17 fiscal year.

(b) The chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall approve, no later than February 28 of the prior fiscal year, a preliminary schedule of allocations to each consortium of any funds proposed in the Governor’s Budget for the program.

(c) The chancellor and the Superintendent, with the advice of the executive director, shall approve, within 15 days of enactment of the annual Budget Act, a final schedule of allocations to each consortium of any funds appropriated by the Legislature for the program.

(d) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall determine the amount to be allocated to each consortium based on the following:

(1) The amount of funds apportioned to the members of that consortium in the immediately preceding fiscal year.

(2) That adult education region’s share of the statewide need for adult education.

(3) That consortium’s effectiveness in meeting the educational needs of adults in the adult education region based on available data.

(e) Using the final schedule approved pursuant to subdivision (c), the chancellor and the Superintendent shall do one of the following for each consortium:

(1) Apportion funds to
 a fund administrator designated by the members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after approval of the final schedule of allocations.

(2) Apportion funds to members of a consortium beginning no more than 30 days after receipt of a final distribution schedule from that consortium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84910.

The chancellor and the Superintendent shall, when approving a schedule of allocations for a fiscal year, also present preliminary projections for the amounts that would be allocated in the subsequent two fiscal years. This preliminary presentation shall not constitute a binding commitment of funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84911.

To determine the need for adult education, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall consider, at a minimum, measures related to adult population, employment, immigration, educational attainment, and adult literacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84912.

The chancellor and the Superintendent shall apportion funds appropriated for the program in a given year in compliance with all of the following:

(a) No more than one-twelfth of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of July.

(b) No more than one-sixth of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of August.

(c) No more than one-quarter of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of September.

(d) No more than one-third of the total amount
 appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of October.

(e) No more than five-twelfths of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of November.

(f) No more than one-half of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of December.

(g) No more than seven-twelfths of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of January.

(h) No more than two-thirds of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of February.

(i) No more than three-quarters of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of March.

(j) No more than five-sixths of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of April.

(k) No more than eleven-twelfths of the total amount appropriated shall have been apportioned by the end of May.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84913.

(a) Funds apportioned for the program shall be used only for support of the following:

(1) Programs in elementary and secondary basic skills, including programs leading to a high school diploma or high school equivalency certificate.

(2) Programs for immigrants eligible for educational services in citizenship, English as a second language, and workforce preparation.

(3) Programs for adults, including, but not limited to, older adults, that are primarily related to entry or reentry into the workforce.

(4) Programs for adults, including, but not limited to, older adults, that
 are primarily designed to develop knowledge and skills to assist elementary and secondary school children to succeed academically in school.

(5) Programs for adults with disabilities.

(6) Programs in career technical education that are short term in nature and have high employment potential.

(7) Programs offering preapprenticeship training activities conducted in coordination with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for the occupation and geographic area.

(8) (A) Indirect costs of the program’s consortium members.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “indirect costs” means either of the following:

(i) For consortium members that are school districts and county offices of education, the lesser of the member’s prior year indirect cost rate, as approved by the department, or no more than 5 percent of the total funding received from the program.

(ii) For community college consortium members, the lesser of the member’s prior year negotiated indirect cost rate or no more than 5 percent of the total funding received from the program.

(b) A consortium may use no more than 5 percent of funds allocated in a given fiscal year for the sum of the following:

(1) The costs of administration of these programs.

(2) The costs of the consortium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 43.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

84914.

(a) As a condition of receipt of an apportionment from the program, a consortium shall approve a distribution schedule that includes both of the following:

(1) The amount of funds to be distributed to each member of the consortium for that fiscal year.

(2) A narrative justifying how the planned allocations are consistent with the adult education plan.

(b) (1) For any fiscal year for which the chancellor and the Superintendent allocate an amount of funds to the consortium greater than the amount allocated in the prior fiscal year, the amount of funds to be distributed to a member of that consortium shall be equal to
 or greater than the amount distributed in the prior fiscal year, unless the consortium makes at least one of the following findings related to the member for which the distribution would be reduced:

(A) The member no longer wishes to provide services consistent with the adult education plan.

(B) The member cannot provide services that address the needs identified in the adult education plan.

(C) The member has been consistently ineffective in providing services that address the needs identified in the adult education plan, including having excessive carryover for at least two consecutive fiscal years beginning with the 2022–23 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, and reasonable interventions have not resulted in improvements.

(2) For any fiscal
 year for which the chancellor and the Superintendent allocate an amount of funds to the consortium less than the amount allocated in the prior fiscal year, the amount of funds to be distributed to a member of that consortium shall not be reduced by a percentage greater than the percentage by which the total amount of funds allocated to the consortium decreased, unless the consortium makes at least one of the following findings related to the member for which the distribution would be reduced further:

(A) The member no longer wishes to provide services consistent with the adult education plan.

(B) The member cannot provide services that address the needs identified in the adult education plan.

(C) The member has been ineffective in providing services that address the needs identified in the adult education plan,
 including having excessive carryover for at least two consecutive fiscal years beginning with the 2022–23 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, and reasonable interventions have not resulted in improvements.

(c) A distribution schedule shall also include preliminary projections of the amount of funds that would be distributed to each member of the consortium in each of the subsequent two fiscal years. The preliminary projections shall not constitute a binding commitment of funds.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, a finding made by a consortium shall require a majority vote of its membership.

(2) A consortium that makes a finding by majority vote pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) based on a member
 having excessive carryover for at least two consecutive fiscal years may reduce the member’s allocation by no more than the amount of the member’s carryover.

(e) (1) A consortium with carryover from one or more prior fiscal years exceeding 20 percent shall be required to submit a written expenditure plan, including future corrective actions to reduce the consortium’s carryover to below 20 percent, to the chancellor and the Superintendent.

(2) For each fiscal year that a consortium has carryover of more than 20 percent, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall prescribe and assign technical assistance to that consortium to ensure that adequate adult education services are provided to the region in proportion to the region’s available funding.

(3) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall
 ensure that the consortium funding remains dedicated to that consortium’s region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 519, Sec. 2.   (AB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

84914.1.

Program funds received by a participating school district shall be deposited in a separate fund of the school district to be known as the Adult Education Fund. Moneys in an Adult Education Fund shall be expended only for adult education purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 11.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

84915.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to coordinate programs that support education and workforce services for adults.

(b) No later than January 31, 2016, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall submit to the Director of Finance, to the State Board of Education, and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature a plan approved by the chancellor and the Superintendent to distribute funds from the following programs to the consortia:

(1) (A) The federal Adult Education and Family Literacy Act (Title II of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act).

(B) The plan for allocating funds under this paragraph shall comply with the criteria enumerated in subsection (e) of Section 3321 of Title 29 of the United States Code related to base disbursement of these funds.

(2) The federal Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act (Public Law 109-270).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 39.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

84916.

Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, any community college district, school district, or county office of education or any joint powers authority consisting of community college districts, school districts, county offices of education, or a combination of these entities, that receives funds from any of the following programs or allocations, shall be a member of a consortium pursuant to this article and any other entity that receives funds from any of the following programs or allocations shall participate in a consortium pursuant to this article. Each consortium shall use the 2018–19 fiscal year as a planning year to engage with members and participants located within the boundaries of the adult education region that receive funding from the following list, and shall include those entities in planning activities related to the consortium’s
 three-year plan, as adopted pursuant to Section 84906:

(a) The Adults in Correctional Facilities program.

(b) The federal Adult Education and Family Literacy Act (Title II of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act).

(c) The federal Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act (Public Law 109-270).

(d) Local control funding formula apportionments received for students who are 19 years of age or older.

(e) Community college apportionments received for providing instruction in courses in the areas listed in subdivision (a) of Section 84913.

(f) State funds for pretransfer-level education and job training
 services for participants in the CalWORKs program.

(g) State funds for adult literacy or career online high school programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 10.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

84917.

(a) To inform actions taken by the Governor and the Legislature related to adult education, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall report to the Director of Finance, the Statewide Director of Immigrant Integration, the state board, and, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the Legislature about the use of the funds described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 84906 and outcomes
 for adults statewide and in each adult education region. The chancellor and the Superintendent shall provide a report on or before February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are appropriated for the program. Each report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be based on all data available at the time of its submission, and
 shall include at least all of the following:

(1) A summary of the adult education plan operative for each consortium.

(2) The distribution schedule for each consortium.

(3) The types and levels of services provided by each consortium.

(4) The effectiveness of each consortium in meeting the educational needs of adults in its respective region.

(5) Any recommendations related to delivery of education, immigrant integration, and workforce services for adults, including recommendations related to improved alignment of state programs.

(b) (1) The chancellor and the Superintendent may require
 a consortium, as a condition of receipt of an apportionment, to submit any reports or data necessary to produce the report described in subdivision (a).

(2) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall align the data used to produce the report described in subdivision (a) with data reported by local educational agencies for other purposes, such as data used for purposes of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128).

(3) The Employment Development Department and the California Workforce Investment Board shall provide any assistance needed to align delivery of services across state and regional workforce, education, and job service programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 26.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

84920.

(a) To the extent that one-time funding is made available in the Budget Act of 2015, consistent with the provisions of Section 84917, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall identify common measures for determining the effectiveness of members of each consortium in meeting the educational needs of adults. At a minimum, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall accomplish both of the following:

(1) Define the specific data each consortium shall collect.

(2) Establish a menu of common assessments and policies regarding placement of adults seeking education and workforce services into adult education programs to be used by each consortium to measure educational needs of adults and the effectiveness
 of providers in addressing those needs.

(b) Consistent with the provisions of Section 84917, the chancellor and the Superintendent, with input from the Statewide Director of Immigrant Integration and adult education program providers, shall identify common measures consistent with, but not limited to, the English literacy and civics (EL Civics) education program’s Civic Objectives and Additional Assessment Plans under Title II of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) for meeting the needs of immigrant and refugee adults seeking integration. At a minimum, the chancellor and the Superintendent, with input from the Statewide Director of Immigrant Integration, shall accomplish both of the following:

(1) Define the specific data each consortium may collect.

(2) Establish a menu of
 common assessments and policies regarding placement of adults seeking immigrant integration into adult education programs to be used by each consortium to measure educational needs of adults and the effectiveness of providers in addressing those needs.

(c) No later than August 1, 2017, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall report to the Director of Finance, the State Board of Education, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on options for integrating the assessments described in subdivision (a) into the common assessment system developed pursuant to Section 78219. The report shall address compliance of the assessments with federal and state funding requirements for adult education programs, identify estimated costs and timelines for the assessments, and identify changes in policies that may be needed to avoid duplicate assessments.

(d) It is the
 intent of the Legislature that both of the following occur:

(1) That the educational needs of adults in the state be better identified and understood through better sharing of data across state agencies.

(2) That, at a minimum, the chancellor and the Superintendent shall enter into agreements to share data related to effectiveness of the consortia between their agencies and with other state agencies, including, but not necessarily limited to, the Employment Development Department and the California Workforce Investment Board.

(e) The chancellor and the Superintendent, with input from the Statewide Director of Immigrant Integration and adult education program providers, as applicable, shall identify, no later than July 1, 2019, the measures for assessing the effectiveness of consortia that will be used in the report
 that is required pursuant to Section 84917. These measures shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following, as applicable:

(1) How many adults are served by members of the consortium.

(2) How many adults served by members of the consortium have demonstrated the following:

(A) Improved literacy skills.

(B) Immigrant integration in the areas consistent with, but not limited to, those already identified for English literacy and civics under Title II of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), including increased participation in civic and community life.

(C) Completion of high school diplomas or their recognized equivalents.

(D) Completion of postsecondary certificates, degrees, or training programs.

(E) Placement into jobs.

(F) Improved wages.

(f) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall apportion the funds appropriated for purposes of this section in the Budget Act of 2015 in accordance with both of the following:

(1) Eighty-five percent of these funds shall be used for grants to consortia to establish systems or obtain data necessary to submit any reports or data required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 84917.

(2) Fifteen percent of these funds shall be used for grants for development of statewide policies and procedures related to data
 collection or reporting or for technical assistance to consortia, or both.

(g) The chancellor and the Superintendent shall provide any guidance to the consortia necessary to support the sharing of data included in systems established by consortia pursuant to this section across consortia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 751, Sec. 2.   (AB 2098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Expenditures and Appropriations [85220. - 85304.]



  ARTICLE 3. Temporary Transfer, County to District, Excess Balances [85220. - 85223.]

85220.
